Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3917.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 180.14 of Title 17, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this act:
1. "Public utility" shall have the same meaning as it is
defined in Section 151 of Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
2. "Large load data center" means a facility that:
a. primarily stores, manages, and processes digital data,
b. is used to house computer and network systems,
including associated components such as servers,
Req. No. 14216 Page 1

network equipment and appliances, telecommunications,
and data storage systems, systems for monitoring and
managing infrastructure performance, Internet-related
equipment and services, data communications
connections, environmental controls, fire protection
systems, and security systems and services, and
c. has, or is projected to have, a monthly demand of at
least fifty (50) megawatts.
B. A public utility that provides electric services to large
load data center customers shall file with the Oklahoma Corporation
Commission an updated schedule of tariffs for approval, which
schedule shall include a surcharge for large load data center
customers to be applied during periods of peak demand on the
electrical grid.
C. A public utility shall transfer to the Corporation
Commission all monies collected from the surcharge established
pursuant to subsection B of this section, which monies shall be
deposited by the Commission into the "Grid Modernization Revolving
Fund" created in Section 2 of this act.
D. The Corporation Commission is authorized to promulgate rules
to effectuate the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 180.15 of Title 17, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Req. No. 14216 Page 2

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Oklahoma Corporation Commission to be designated the "Grid
Modernization Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund,
not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all
monies received by the Corporation Commission from the surcharge
collected by public utilities pursuant to Section 1 of this act.
All monies accruing to the credit of said fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Commission for
the purpose of modernizing the state's electric grid. Expenditures
from said fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State
Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14216 JBH 01/13/26








Req. No. 14216 Page 3